Utah statutes.
4-26-4.   Failure to close entrance to enclosure -- Class "C" misdemeanor --
Damages.
Any person who willfully throws down a fence or opens bars or gates into any
enclosure other than the person's own enclosure or into any enclosure jointly
owned or occupied by such person and others, and leaves it open is guilty of a
class "C" misdemeanor, and is also liable in damage for any injury sustained
by any person as a result of such an act.
